src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON preterite_АМНЫ
 preterite ;
!2018-01-29!+Ind+Prt1@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@:%>%{иі%}@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@ PresPret1 ; 
!2018-01-29!+Ind+Prt1@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@:%>%{иі%}@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@  P3 ; ! 3 
!2018-01-29!	Pret2a-0 ;

LEXICON preterite_КУТНЫ
 preterite ;
!2018-01-29!+Ind+Prt1@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@:%>%{иі%}@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@ PresPret1 ; 
!2018-01-29!+Ind+Prt1@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@:%>%{иі%}@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@  P3 ; ! 3 
!2018-01-29!	Pret2a-0 ;

LEXICON imperative
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Imprt+Pl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ӧй VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Imprt+Pl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>эй VerbEnd ;

LEXICON PossessiveSuffixes
+PxSg1:%>ым K ;
            PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ;


LEXICON PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1
:     K ; !The ZERO Tag is used for +PxSg1 2017-03-23
+PxSg2:%>ыд  K ;
+PxSg3:%>ыс  K ;
+PxPl1:%>ным K ;
+PxPl2:%>ныд K ;
+PxPl3:%>ныс K ;


LEXICON PresPret1  ! First and second person
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Sg1:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Sg2:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>н VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>м VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>мӧ VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>ме VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>мӧй VerbEnd-Comparison ;  ! imperatiivi / optatiivi ??
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>мей VerbEnd-Comparison ;  ! imperatiivi / optatiivi ??
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>нныд VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>д VerbEnd-Comparison ; 

LEXICON P3         
@U.CONJ-PX.3@:@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>с PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! This is regular
@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-PX.3@  PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! This is usually restricted to intransitives


LEXICON PresPret1-SgPl3
  SG3 ; 
  PL3 ;
  
LEXICON SG3
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Sg3:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
  
LEXICON PL3
!duplicate@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ныс VerbEnd-Comparison ;

LEXICON Pret2a
:%{ая%} PRET2-linkki-a ; 
   PRET2PL2 ; 
   PL3 ;   ! for continuation in different persons. 
                  !Could also have used the homonymic participle
                  ! as point of departure

LEXICON PRET2PL2
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Sg2:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ыд VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ныд VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ныдӧсь VerbEnd-Comparison ; !224
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ныдэсь VerbEnd-Comparison ; !224
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd-Comparison ; !227

LEXICON PRET2-linkki-a
!+Sg1+Use/NG+Err/Orth: VerbEnd-Comparison ; ! no Sg1 for Prt2 in the standard
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Sg1:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;  
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Sg3:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
!+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>ӧсь VerbEnd-Comparison ; ! no Pl1 for Prt2 in the standard
!+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Err/Dial:%>эсь VerbEnd-Comparison ; ! no Pl1 for Prt2 in the standard
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>ӧсь VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ӧсь VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>эсь VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>эсь VerbEnd-Comparison ;

LEXICON MatrixVerb-Comparison
               K ;
+Der+Der/моз+Ger:%>моз K ;
+Comp:%>джык K ;
+Der/кодь:%>кодь K ;

!This is where Serial verbs are made possible
LEXICON VerbEnd-Comparison
 Serial-Verbs ;
 MatrixVerb-Comparison ;

LEXICON VerbEnd
 Serial-Verbs ;
 K ;

!! ## Derivation
! ==========

LEXICON Non-finiteforms
VerbDer ; ! to be merged with next
          !2011-11-02 dealing with serial verbs there may be
          ! reason to distinguish between V2V derivation and non-finite forms

LEXICON Verb-nyDer !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ;
Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW ;

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset in consonant
!! verb-to-verb

!! This is fed by LEXICON V_ШУНЫ, and therefore certain corrections
!! must be made 2012-01-18

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/л:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>л  V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!босьтлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>лывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!босьтлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сь V_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ; !! овсьыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сьышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!вежсьыштны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сьыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !! пусьыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сьыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!?? пусьыштлыны
! зь:зь  !!югзьыны
! Why do the suffixes above have ">" marking
! while the ones below do not?
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ч V_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ; !!босьтчыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы+Der/л:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чыл V_ШУНЫ ; !!дӧзмӧдчывны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы+Der/ышт+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!босьтчыштлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !! босьтчыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы+Der/ышт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!босьтчыштны

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
 Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Ы ;
 Verb-nyDer-ONSET-А ;

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Ы !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ;   !!сёйыштлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ;  !!сёйыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!сёйыштны

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-А !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
	Verb-nyDer-ONSET-А/Я ;
LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-А/Я
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ал:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>%{ая%}л V_ШУНЫ ; !!сетавны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/овт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>овт V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/овт+Err/Dial:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>ол%^C2Vт V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ась:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>%{ая%}сь V_ШУНЫ ; !! босьтасьны

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Я !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ал:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>%{ая%}л V_ШУНЫ ; !!сетавны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/овт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>ёвт V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/овт+Err/Dial:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>ёл%^C2Vт V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ась:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>%{ая%}сь V_ШУНЫ ; !! босьтасьны


!! verb-to-noun
 
LEXICON VerbDer !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer-ONSET_Ӧ ; !! FIX THIS 2015-09-06
 VerbDer-ONSET_А/Я ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 

LEXICON VerbDer_КЫЙНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
: VerbDer-ONSET_Ӧ ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
: VerbDer-ONSET_Я ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
: VerbDer-ONSET_И ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**

LEXICON VerbDer_КУТНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer-ONSET_Ӧ ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer-ONSET_А ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer-ONSET_І ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**

LEXICON VerbDer_АРТАСЬНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
: VerbDer-ONSET_Ӧ ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer-ONSET_Я ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer-ONSET_И ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**

LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_Ӧ !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Der+Der/ӧм+Der/NomAct+N:%>ӧм N_ ;
+Der+Der/ӧм+PastPtc:%>ӧм K ;
+Der+Der/ӧм+PastPtc+N:%>ӧма N_ ; !OKK:50
+Der+Der/ӧм+Der+Der/NomAct+Ger:%>ӧмпырысь K ;
+Der+Der/ӧм+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ins:%>ӧмӧн K ;
+Der+Der/ӧм+Der/Ин+N:%>ӧм%>%{иі%}н N_ ;
+Der+Der/ӧм+Der/Ин+N:%>ӧм%>тор N_PARAGOGIC-J ;

+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/ӧм+Der/NomAct+N:%>эм N_ ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/ӧм+PastPtc:%>эм K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/ӧм+Der+Der/NomAct+Ger:%>эмпырысь K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/ӧм+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ins:%>эмен K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/ӧм+Der/Ин+N:%>эм%>%{иі%}н N_ ;

+Der+Der/Ан+Der/Ин+N:%>%{ая%}н%>%{иі%}н N_ ;
+Der+Der/Ан+Der/Ин+N:%>%{ая%}н%>тор N_PARAGOGIC-J ;
+Der+Der/Ан+PrsPrc+N:%>%{ая%}н N_ ;
!2017-10-27+Der+Der/Ан+ActPrsPtc:%>%{ая%}н K ;
+Der+Der/Ан+PrsPtc:%>%{ая%}н K ;
+Der+Der/ысь+ActPrsPtc:%>ысь PredMonLex ; ! 2020-11-19 adjectival
+Der+Der/ысь+Der/NomAg+N:%>ысь N_ ;

LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_І !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
  ! nonfinites
 VerbDer-ONSET_И/І ;

LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_И !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer-ONSET_И/І ;
